Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2523.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 204 of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971, is amended by adding a clause to read:Section 204. Exclusions from Tax.--The tax imposed by section 202 shall not be imposed upon any of the following:* * *(77) The sale at retail or use of school supplies during the exclusion period to an individual purchaser for educational purposes. The department shall publish a notice on the publicly 12345678910111213141516171819202122 accessible Internet website of the department to provide guidance on the implementation of the exclusion under this clause. For the purposes of this clause, the following terms or phrases shall have the following meanings:"Art supplies" shall mean clay and glazes, paints, paintbrushes, sketch and drawing pads and watercolors."Exclusion period" shall mean the three-month period between July 1, 2026, and September 30, 2026, and between each July 1 and the succeeding September 30 thereafter."Instructional materials" shall mean reference books, reference maps and globes, textbooks and workbooks."Purchaser" shall mean an individual who places an order and pays the purchase price by cash or credit during the exclusion period, even if delivery takes place after the exclusion period."School supplies" shall mean items such as book bags, pens, pencils, pencil sharpeners, markers, highlighters, erasers, crayons, blackboard chalk, notebooks, binders, folders, paper, index cards, glue, tape, rulers, scissors, staplers, staples, paper clips, printer ink, calculators, compasses, protractors, lunch boxes, school supply boxes, personal organizers, art supplies, clipboards, dry erase markers, sticky notes, bulletin board paper, educational posters, games and instructional materials with a sales price of fifty dollars ($50) or less per item.Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.20260HB2523PN3416 - 2 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425